Florida, session 2026, HB4067.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
40
41 Section 1. Plantation Acres Improvement District
42 transition.—The Plantation Acres Improvement District, an
43 independent special district created by a special act of the
44 Legislature, shall become a dependent district of the City of
45 Plantation on the effective date of this act.
46 (1) All special acts of the Plantation Acres Improvement
47 District, chapters 67-924, 82-274, 86-355, 99-426, 2002-367, and
48 2009-251, Laws of Florida, are repealed, and their provisions
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4067 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4067 2026 Legislature
49 shall become ordinances of the City of Plantation on the
50 effective date of this act. The provisions of chapter 298,
51 Florida Statutes, so far as not inconsistent with this act, are
52 applicable to the district as a dependent district of the City
53 of Plantation.
54 (2) The assets, liabilities, financial allocations, and
55 written contracts of the Plantation Acres Improvement District,
56 including all rights, obligations, duties, and relationships now
57 existing by law, easement, permit, or agreement, shall be
58 unaffected and remain in full force and effect and shall be
59 those of the district as a dependent district of the City of
60 Plantation. All rights, claims, actions, and orders, and all
61 contracts of the district and all legal or administrative
62 proceedings involving the district shall continue in full force
63 and effect under the jurisdiction of the district as a dependent
64 district of the City of Plantation.
65 (3) The terms of office of the current members of the
66 board of supervisors of the district shall continue until the
67 members of the city council and the mayor of the City of
68 Plantation assume the offices of the board of supervisors of the
69 district.
70 (4) The jurisdictional boundaries of the district are as
71 follows:
72
73 Beginning at the intersection of the said North right-
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4067 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4067 2026 Legislature
74 of-way of the North New River Canal and the East line
75 of said Section 12; thence due North along the said
76 East line of Section 12 and along the East line of
77 said Section 1 a distance of 3163.04 feet; thence
78 North 0°03′55″ West along the said East line of
79 Section 1 and along the East line of said Section 36,
80 a distance of 5420.00 feet; thence North 0°04′12″ East
81 along the said East line of Section 36, a distance of
82 3762.80 feet to the Northeast corner of said Section
83 36 and the Southeast corner of said Section 25; thence
84 North 0°03′22″ East along the East line of said
85 Section 25 a distance of 1519.54 feet; thence North
86 0°04′014″ West along the said East line of Section 25
87 a distance of 3780.64 feet to the Northeast corner of
88 said Section 25; thence North 88°46′30″ West along the
89 North line of said Section 25 a distance of 5333.38
90 feet to the Northwest corner thereof; thence South
91 0°31′53″ East along the West line of said Section 25 a
92 distance of 5438.54 feet to the Southwest corner of
93 said Section 25 and the Northwest corner of said
94 Section 36; thence South 0°01′08″ East along the West
95 line of said Section 36, a distance of 5314.33 feet to
96 the Southwest corner of said Section 36 and the
97 Northwest corner of said Section 1; thence South
98 0°03′19″ East along the West line of said Section 1, a
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4067 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4067 2026 Legislature
99 distance of 5267.60 feet to the Southwest corner of
100 said Section 1 and the Northwest corner of said
101 Section 12; thence South 0°00′03″ West along the West
102 line of said Section 12, a distance of 353.64 feet to
103 a point on the said North right-of way line of the
104 North New River Canal; thence South 75°17′10″ East
105 along the said North right-of-way line, a distance of
106 5458.67 feet to the Point of Beginning.
107
108 Said lands situate, lying and being in Broward County,
109 Florida, and which said boundary line embraces and
110 includes those certain tracts or parcels of land
111 described as follows:
112
113 Tracts 1 through 64, inclusive of the Subdivision of
114 Section 25, Township 49 South, Range 40 East,
115 according to the Florida Fruit Lands Company's
116 Subdivision Map No. 1, recorded in Plat Book 2, Page
117 17 of the Public Records of Dade County, Florida,
118 together with all rights-of ways and dedications of
119 record.
120
121 Tracts 1 through 24, inclusive, in the Northeast
122 Quarter (NE 1/4); Tracts 1 through 24, inclusive, in
123 the Northwest Quarter (NW 1/4); Tracts 1 through 24,
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4067 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4067 2026 Legislature
124 inclusive, in the Southeast Quarter (SE 1/4); Tracts 1
125 through 24, inclusive in the Southwest Quarter (SW
126 1/4); all according to the subdivision of Section 36,
127 Township 49 South, Range 40 East, according to
128 Chambers Land Company's Subdivision recorded in Plat
129 Book 1, Page 5-A of the Public Records of Broward
130 County, Florida, together with all rights-of-way and
131 dedications of record.
132
133 Tracts 1 through 64, inclusive, of the Subdivision of
134 Section 1, Township 50 South, Range 40 East, according
135 to the Florida Fruit Lands Company's Subdivision Map
136 No. 1, recorded in Plat Book 2, Page 17 of the Public
137 Records of Dade County, Florida, together with all
138 rights-of ways and dedications of record.
139
140 That portion of Section 12, Township 50 South, Range
141 40 East, lying North of the North right-of-way line of
142 North New River Canal. Said land comprising of all of
143 Sections 25 and 36, Township 49 South, Range 40 East;
144 and all of Section 1, Township 50 South, Range 40
145 East; and all that portion of Section 12, Township 50
146 South, Range 40 East, lying North of the North right-
147 of-way line of the North New River Canal.
148
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4067 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4067 2026 Legislature
149 (5) To the extent not inconsistent with city ordinances,
150 all resolutions and policies of the district shall remain in
151 effect until amended, revised, or repealed by the city.
152 (6) Additional provisions that are necessary to effect
153 this transition and to provide for the operation of the district
154 as a dependent district of the city shall be adopted by
155 ordinance.
156 Section 2. The Plantation Acres Improvement District
157 dissolution.—
158 (1) The Plantation Acres Improvement District, an
159 independent special district, is dissolved upon the effective
160 date of this act.
161 (2) On and after October 1, 2026, the district shall take
162 only those further actions necessary to wind down its affairs;
163 shall not incur any further debt, obligations, or liabilities;
164 and shall take all steps necessary for the orderly transfer of
165 its assets and liabilities to the district as a dependent
166 district of the city.
167 Section 3. Referendum.—
168 (1) The referendum election called for by this act shall
169 be held on or before October 1, 2026, for qualified electors of
170 the Plantation Acres Improvement District, in accordance with
171 chapter 2002-367, Laws of Florida, on the question of whether
172 the Plantation Acres Improvement District, an independent
173 special district, shall be dissolved and become a dependent
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4067 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4067 2026 Legislature
174 district of the City of Plantation. The referendum election
175 shall be held as a stand-alone special election that shall not
176 take place during any other countywide or statewide election.
177 The cost of the election shall be borne by the Plantation Acres
178 Improvement District, an independent special district.
179 (2) The ballot title for the referendum question shall be
180 in substantially the following form:
181
182 CONVERSION OF PLANTATION ACRES IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT FROM
183 INDEPENDENT DISTRICT TO DEPENDENT DISTRICT
184
185 (3) The referendum question shall be placed on the ballot
186 in substantially the following form:
187
188 Shall Chapter 2026-___, Laws of Florida, converting the
189 Plantation Acres Improvement District from an independent
190 district to a dependent district of the City of Plantation, and
191 providing that the city council and the mayor of the City of
192 Plantation shall serve as the board of the dependent district,
193 become effective?
194
195 ( ) YES.
196 ( ) NO.
197
198 (4) In the event that this question is answered in the
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4067 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4067 2026 Legislature
199 affirmative by a majority of the qualified voters voting in the
200 referendum, the Plantation Acres Improvement District, an
201 independent special district, shall become a dependent district
202 of the City of Plantation, and the Plantation Acres Improvement
203 District, an independent special district, shall be dissolved,
204 effective October 1, 2026.
205 Section 4. The provisions of this act shall be liberally
206 construed in order to effectively carry out the purposes of this
207 act in the interest of public health, welfare, and safety as
208 served by the Plantation Acres Improvement District.
209 Section 5. In the event of a conflict between any
210 provision of this act and the provisions of any other act, the
211 provisions of this act shall control to the extent of such
212 conflict.
213 Section 6. This act shall take effect only if a majority
214 of those qualified electors of the Plantation Acres Improvement
215 District, an independent special district, voting in accordance
216 with chapter 2002-367, Laws of Florida, in a referendum held
217 pursuant to this act approve the referendum question in section
218 3, except that this section and section 3 shall take effect upon
219 becoming a law.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4067 -00-er